Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.335

Withdrawal of proposal—Time and manner of adoption.

(1) A proposed rule may be withdrawn by the proposing agency at any time before adoption. A withdrawn rule may not be adopted unless it is again proposed in accordance with RCW 34.05.320.

(2) Before adopting a rule, an agency shall consider the written and oral submissions, or any memorandum summarizing oral submissions.

(3) Rules not adopted and filed with the code reviser within one hundred eighty days after publication of the text as last proposed in the register shall be regarded as withdrawn. An agency may not thereafter adopt the proposed rule without refiling it in accordance with RCW 34.05.320. The code reviser shall give notice of the withdrawal in the register.

(4) An agency may not adopt a rule before the time established in the published notice, or such later time established on the record or by publication in the state register.

[ 1989 c 175 s 8; 1988 c 288 s 306; 1980 c 186 s 11. Formerly RCW 34.04.048.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.

Severability—1980 c 186: See note following RCW 34.05.320.